Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.048

Renewal of registration of corporate name.

A corporation[,] which has in effect a registration of its corporate name, may renew such registration in accordance with RCW 23.95.315.

[ 2015 c 176 s 4106; 1982 c 35 s 124.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.